ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/en_US/hyph_en_US.dic
x2uy1
xo1ra1
xor1d
xo1ru
xo1ri
xo1d
x2os
xo1sk
x3ost
xo1sp
xo1n2a
xon1e
x2ob
x2o1c
xo1tr
xotrop3
x2o1th
x2oto
xo1te
xo2g1
xo1p
x2o1phy
xche1
xci2t
xci1ta4
xcit3a1to
xi1al
xia1m
xi1da
xi1diz
xidi3za1t
xi1so
xis2t1i
xi1om
xiom1a
xi1b
xi1co
xi1er
xiet1i
xi1e2t
xie1l
xi1f
x2i1to
xi1la
xil1i4
xil1ia1
xil3l
xigu1
x2i1gl
xi1ma
xi1mu
xi1mi
xi2m1it
ximi3za
x2i1w
xi1z
xe1r1a
xero1s
xero4g
xer2i
xer1e
x2ed
x3e1dr2
xe1u
xeno1g
xe1cr2
xec3u1to
xe1g
xfor2
x1f2o
xtrac4
xtrac3t3a
xtra2ct
x2th
xtur1a
xtu1b
xtol3ler
xtend3e
x1tend
x2l1v
x2let
x2y
xy1a
xy1r
x3ys
xy1u
xycho1
xy1c
x3y1cy
xy1t
xyla2
xyl1at
x3yg
xy1mo1
xy1p
xpand3e
xpa1t
xpos1i1to4
xpo1n
xpi1ra
xpi1ry
x3pe
x2pe1d
xpec1to3
xpe2ct
xpel3li
xqui1
x2x1
’2c
’wes2t2
